Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-263.02
Water; molesting or damaging measuring device; apprehension and conviction; reward.

The Chief Water Officer is hereby authorized and empowered to offer and pay out of the fees collected by the Chief Water Officer rewards of not to exceed twenty-five dollars in any case for the apprehension and conviction of any person or persons violating the provisions of section 46-263.01.

Laws 1947, c. 172, § 4, p. 522;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 124;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 105.